Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-1847
Public natural gas utilities; requirements.

Natural gas utilities owned and operated by a city or a metropolitan utilities district shall establish rates and conditions of service for all residential ratepayers of each such utility in a nondiscriminatory manner.

Laws 2003, LB 790, § 47.